Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5122.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 202. A consumer may use a qualified photo identification to verify the consumer's age to purchase or consume alcoholic liquor under this act. As used in this section: (a) "Consumer" means that term as defined in section 203. (b) "Qualified photo identification" means any of the following: (i) An operator's or chauffeur's license issued under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or an enhanced driver license issued under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308. (ii) An official state personal identification card issued under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300, or an enhanced official state personal identification card issued under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308. (iii) A current operator's or chauffeur's license issued by another state. (iv) A current state personal identification card issued by another state. (v) A current state government issued photo identification card. (vi) A current United States passport or federal government issued photo identification card. (vii) A current military photo identification card. (viii) A current tribal photo identification card. (ix) A current photo identification card issued by a local government. (x) A current student photo identification card issued by an educational institution.